Utah statutes.
76-6-509.   Bribery of a labor official.
(1) Any person who offers, confers, or agrees to confer upon a labor official
any benefit with intent to influence him in respect to any of his acts,
decisions, or duties as a labor official is guilty of bribery of a labor
official.
(2)  Bribery of a labor official is a felony of the third degree.
